Florida, session 2026, HB1099.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (3) through (7) of section
744.2005, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (4)
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1099-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1099 2026
through (8), respectively, subsection (2) and present subsection
(3) are amended, and a new subsection (3) is added to that
section, to read:
744.2005 Order of appointment.—
(2) The order appointing a guardian must:
(a) State the nature of the guardianship as either plenary
or limited. If limited, the order must state that the guardian
may exercise only those delegable rights which have been removed
from the incapacitated person and specifically delegated to the
guardian.
(b) The order shall State the specific powers and duties
of the guardian.
(c) Identify the persons entitled to receive notice of the
following information, when such information is known or can be
reasonably ascertained by the guardian:
1. The incapacitated person's death.
2. The intended disposition of the remains of the
decedent.
3. The funeral arrangements for the decedent.
4. The final resting place of the decedent.
(d)(3) The order appointing a guardian must Be consistent
with the incapacitated person's welfare and safety, must be the
least restrictive appropriate alternative, and must reserve to
the incapacitated person the right to make decisions in all
matters commensurate with the person's ability to do so.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1099-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1099 2026
(3) The order appointing a guardian may:
(a) Identify the persons entitled to notice of the
incapacitated person's transfer to a medical facility.
(b) Identify the persons entitled to visit the
incapacitated person. However, the identification of such
persons in the order does not limit the persons entitled to
visit the incapacitated person.
Section 2. Paragraphs (b) and (h) of subsection (13) of
section 744.361, Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraph
(k) is added to that subsection, to read:
744.361 Powers and duties of guardian.—
(13) Recognizing that every individual has unique needs
and abilities, a guardian who is given authority over a ward's
person shall, as appropriate under the circumstances:
(b) Allow the ward to maintain contact with family and
friends. If the ward is a minor, the guardian may restrict the
ability of the ward to maintain any contact that the guardian
believes may cause harm to the ward. If the ward is an adult,
the guardian may restrict the ability of the ward to maintain
contact with a specified person if the guardian has good cause
to believe that interaction with the person poses a risk of
significant physical, psychological, or financial harm to the
ward and the restriction is:
1. For a period of not more than 7 business days, if the
person has a familial or preexisting social relationship with
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1099-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1099 2026
the ward;
2. For a period of not more than 60 days, if the person
does not have a familial or preexisting social relationship with
the ward; or
3. Authorized by specific order of the court unless the
guardian believes that such contact may cause harm to the ward.
(h) Evaluate the ward's medical and health care options,
financial resources, and desires when making residential
decisions that are best suited for the current needs of the
ward. The guardian must provide the ward with notice of a change
in residential setting at least 14 days before the change occurs
if the new residential setting will be more restrictive than the
ward's current residential setting. Such notice is not required
if the change in residential setting is authorized by the
guardianship plan or a court order.
(k) Provide appropriate notice to any person identified in
an order of appointment.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1099-00